Alaska, session 34, SB80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 08.03.010(c)(9) is amended to read: 07 (9) Big Game Commercial Services Board (AS 08.54.591) - June 30, 08 2024 [2032]; 09 * Sec. 2. AS 08.03.010(c)(9), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, is amended to read: 10 (9) Big Game Commercial Services Board (AS 08.54.591) - June 30, 11 2032 [2024]; 12 * Sec. 3. AS 08.03.010(c)(12) is amended to read: 13 (12) Board of Massage Therapists (AS 08.61.010) - June 30, 2024 14 [2030]; 01 * Sec. 4. AS 08.03.010(c)(12), as amended by sec. 3 of this Act, is amended to read: 02 (12) Board of Massage Therapists (AS 08.61.010) - June 30, 2030 03 [2024]; 04 * Sec. 5. AS 44.66.010(a)(4) is amended to read: 05 (4) Alaska Commission on Aging (AS 44.29.750) - June 30, 2024 06 [2032]; 07 * Sec. 6. AS 44.66.010(a)(4), as amended by sec. 5 of this Act, is amended to read: 08 (4) Alaska Commission on Aging (AS 44.29.750) - June 30, 2032 09 [2024]; 10 * Sec. 7. AS 44.66.010(a)(13) is amended to read: 11 (13) Marijuana Control Board (AS 17.38.080) - June 30, 2024 [2027]; 12 * Sec. 8. AS 44.66.010(a)(13), as amended by sec. 5 of this Act, is amended to read: 13 (13) Marijuana Control Board (AS 17.38.080) - June 30, 2027 [2024]; 14 * Sec. 9. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 15 read: 16 EXEMPTION FROM AS 44.66.050(e). This Act is exempt from the provision of 17 AS 44.66.050(e) that prohibits a bill from continuing or reestablishing more than one board or 18 commission. 19 * Sec. 10. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 20 read: 21 RETROACTIVITY. This Act is retroactive to July 1, 2024. 22 * Sec. 11. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.